Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 11. TITLE INSURANCE

SUBTITLE C. FINANCIAL SOLVENCY

CHAPTER 2601. SUPERVISION, LIQUIDATION, REHABILITATION, REORGANIZATION, OR CONSERVATION OF TITLE INSURANCE COMPANIES AND AGENTS

Sec. 2601.001. SUPERVISION, LIQUIDATION, REHABILITATION, REORGANIZATION, OR CONSERVATION OF TITLE INSURANCE COMPANIES AND AGENTS. Each title insurance agent and title insurance company is subject to Chapters 441 and 443.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 6, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 2I.003, eff. April 1, 2009.